Alaska, session 34, HB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.50.200(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 05 (65) the Alaska Innovation Council (AS 44.33.850). 06 * Sec. 2. AS 44.33 is amended by adding new sections to read: 07 Article 13A. Alaska Innovation Council. 08 Sec. 44.33.850. Alaska Innovation Council. (a) The Alaska Innovation 09 Council is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 10 Development. 11 (b) The council consists of 19 members as follows: 12 (1) the governor or the governor's designee, who shall serve as chair; 13 (2) the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic 14 development or the commissioner's designee; 01 (3) the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner's designee; 02 (4) the executive director of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 03 or the executive director's designee; 04 (5) the executive director of the University of Alaska's Business 05 Enterprise Institute or the executive director's designee; 06 (6) the executive director of the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 07 Education or the executive director's designee; 08 (7) the executive director of the Alaska Industrial Development and 09 Export Authority or the executive director's designee; 10 (8) five members appointed by the governor who are experienced 11 entrepreneurs, experienced investors, engaged in traded sector industry operations in 12 the state, or engaged in a growth business in the state; the members appointed under 13 this paragraph must include 14 (A) one member who is experienced in community startup 15 ecosystem building and new venture creation initiatives with a rural focus; 16 (B) one member who is experienced in community startup 17 ecosystem building and new venture creation initiatives with an urban focus; 18 (C) one member who is experienced and active in angel 19 investing; 20 (D) one member who has founded a startup business that was 21 in an emerging sector or that used a new technology or business model; and 22 (E) one member who works for or is associated with a startup 23 business that is affiliated with an Alaska Native corporation or tribal 24 government; 25 (9) two members appointed by the governor who represent higher 26 education in the state; the members appointed under this paragraph must include one 27 member who is experienced in higher education research, technology transfer, and 28 economic development and one member who is experienced in teaching and student 29 entrepreneurship; 30 (10) one member appointed by the governor who represents a regional 31 development organization in the state; 01 (11) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the 02 speaker of the house of representatives; and 03 (12) two members of the senate appointed by the president of the 04 senate. 05 (c) The members of the council appointed under (b)(8) - (12) of this section 06 serve staggered three-year terms. An appointed member serves at the pleasure of the 07 appointing authority. An appointed member is eligible for reappointment for two 08 additional terms. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall 09 make an appointment to become immediately effective for the remainder of the 10 unexpired term. 11 (d) A legislator ceases to be a member of the council if the legislator ceases to 12 be a member of the house from which the legislator was appointed. 13 (e) A majority of the council constitutes a quorum for the conduct of business. 14 Official action by the council requires a majority vote of the council. 15 (f) The council shall meet at least three times a year. The chair shall set the 16 time and place of the meetings. The council may also meet at other times and places 17 specified by a call of the chair or by written request of a majority of the council. A 18 member of the council may attend a meeting telephonically or by electronic means if 19 the member obtains approval from the chair. 20 (g) The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 21 shall provide staff for the council. 22 (h) The governor or a legislator serving on the council serves without 23 compensation, but is entitled to transportation and per diem expenses as provided in 24 AS 39.20.180 when not otherwise entitled to transportation or per diem expenses by 25 another law. 26 (i) Except as provided in (h) of this section, a member of the council is entitled 27 to compensation at an amount to be set by the governor for each day the member is 28 participating in business of the council and is entitled to per diem and travel expenses 29 as provided in AS 39.20.180. 30 Sec. 44.33.860. Duties and powers. (a) The council shall advise the governor, 31 legislature, governmental agencies, research institutions, and private sector 01 organizations on 02 (1) promoting the commercialization of research from the private 03 sector and higher education institutions; 04 (2) investment in areas of research where the state has a distinct or 05 emerging advantage; 06 (3) stimulating seed and start-up capital investment and 07 entrepreneurship that promotes economic growth in the traded sector industries or 08 growth businesses in the state; and 09 (4) developing entrepreneurship and management capabilities in the 10 state that are critical to remaining competitive in the traded sector industries or growth 11 businesses. 12 (b) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, the council may request a state 13 governmental agency to furnish information and provide advice to the council to the 14 extent necessary to perform the council's duties. 15 (c) The council may establish committees and delegate the duties and powers 16 of the council to the committees. 17 Sec. 44.33.870. Innovation and economic competitiveness plan. Not later 18 than January 1 before the first regular session of each legislature, the council shall 19 prepare an innovation and economic competitiveness plan for the state and submit the 20 report to the governor, senate secretary, and the chief clerk of the house of 21 representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available. The plan must 22 include recommendations on 23 (1) identifying and expanding the industry and core research strengths 24 of the state's traded sector industries and the growth businesses and higher education 25 programs that have the highest potential for commercialization and economic impact; 26 (2) promoting the development and growth of new innovation-based 27 businesses and assisting existing businesses in developing new products; 28 (3) stimulating seed and start-up capital investment and 29 entrepreneurship in a manner that promotes innovation-based economic development 30 in the traded sector industries and growth businesses in the state; 31 (4) developing an innovation index that benchmarks the state, rural 01 areas of the state, and urban areas of the state against national innovation metrics; 02 (5) monitoring the progress and priorities of the state when 03 implementing comprehensive economic development strategies; 04 (6) assessing the needs, recommendations, and effectiveness of 05 regional development organizations; and 06 (7) assessing the effectiveness of regional development organizations 07 in supporting state and local economic development plans. 08 Sec. 44.33.880. Definitions. In AS 44.33.850 – 44.33.880, 09 (1) "council" means the Alaska Innovation Council; 10 (2) "regional development organization" means a nonprofit 11 organization or nonprofit corporation formed to encourage economic development 12 within a particular region of the state that includes the entire area of each municipality 13 within that region and that has a board of directors that represents the region's 14 economic, political, and social interests. 15 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 TRANSITION: INITIAL TERMS OF ALASKA INNOVATION COUNCIL 18 MEMBERS. Notwithstanding AS 44.33.850(c), enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, members of the 19 Alaska Innovation Council are appointed to initial terms as follows: 20 (1) members appointed under AS 44.33.850(b)(8), enacted by sec. 1 of this 21 Act, shall serve one-year terms; 22 (2) members appointed under AS 44.33.850(b)(9) and (10), enacted by sec. 1 23 of this Act, shall serve two-year terms; and 24 (3) members appointed under AS 44.33.850(b)(11) and (12), enacted by sec. 1 25 of this Act, shall serve three-year terms. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.